New York, session 2025-2026, A8829.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The Burnside subway station on the IRT Jerome Avenue line 2 of the New York city subway is hereby named the Burnside-Bronx Community 3 College subway station. The MTA shall ensure that all signs, maps, and 4 any other items issued by the MTA are updated to accurately reflect the 5 new name of such station within such time and in such manner as the MTA 6 shall deem appropriate. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 8 deemed repealed after the signs and any other items are accurately 9 updated. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11960-01-5